Tennessee, session 114, SB2168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SB2168
010623
- 1 -

SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) November 7 of each year, LEAs and public charter schools shall recognize
the day as "Victims of Communism Day" to honor victims of communist regimes.
(b) If an LEA or public charter school provides a world history and geography
course to high school students enrolled in an LEA or public charter school, then the LEA
or public charter school shall provide the students enrolled in the course with at least
forty-five (45) minutes of instruction on how victims suffered under communist regimes,
including through poverty, starvation, migration, systemized lethal violence, and
suppression of speech, in conjunction with any of the following topics:
(1) Mao Zedong and the Cultural Revolution;
(2) Joseph Stalin and the Soviet System;
(3) Fidel Castro and the Cuban Revolution;
(4) Pol Pot and the Khmer Rouge; or
(5) Nicolás Maduro and the Chavismo movement.
(c) If Victims of Communism Day is on a day that a high school student who is
enrolled in a world history and geography course does not receive instruction for the
course, then the student must receive the instruction required by this section on the next
day that the student receives instruction for the course.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2026-2027 school year and subsequent school years.
- 2 - 010623